District of Columbia statutes.
47-2713

District of Columbia General Hospital rates.

(a)

The per diem rates to be charged for inpatient services at the District of Columbia General Hospital shall be as follows:

Medical $215.00.
Surgical 216.00.
Pediatrics 278.00.
Obstetrics 370.00.
Crippled children 232.00.
Gynecology 130.00.
The rates to be charged for emergency room services, clinic abortion, and hemodialysis treatment services at the District of Columbia General Hospital shall be as follows:
Emergency room $53.50 per visit.
Clinic abortion 360.00 per abortion.
Hemodialysis treatment 316.00 per treatment.
The rates to be charged for mental health, mental retardation clinic, and home psychiatry services rendered to patients shall be as follows:
For mental health services:
Inpatients $140.00 per day.
Daypatients 66.50 per day.
Outpatients 43.50 per day.
For mental retardation clinic services:
Daypatients $55.00 per day.
Outpatients 35.75 per visit.
For home psychiatry services: $19.00 per home visit.

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 2(a), 24 DCR 3343
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
This section is referenced in § 47-2716 and § 47-2717.
1981 Ed., § 47-2713.
1973 Ed., § 47-2213.